src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
Brekke-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Brekke-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Brekke-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Brekke-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Eira-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Eira-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Eira-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Eira-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Paadar-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Paadar-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Paadar-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Paadar-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Rundberg-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Rundberg-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Rundberg-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Rundberg-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Rántel-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Rántel-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Rántel-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Rántel-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Stockholm-vieljažagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Stockholm-vieljažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Stockholm-vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Stockholm-vieljaž MAGASH ;
Stueng-jumežagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Stueng-jumežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
Stueng-jumežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Stueng-jumež MAGASH ;
TV-dieđut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:TV-dieh'tu BUVSSAT ;
LEXICON Noun
bahážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bahážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
bahážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:baháž MAGASH ;
ovdaprošekterengolut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:ovda#prošekteren#gollu BUVSSAT ;
beaivečalbmelásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:beaive#čalbme#lássa BUVSSAT ;
beaivváščalbmelásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:beaivváš#čalbme#lássa BUVSSAT ;
beassážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:beassáž MAGASH ;
beatnatbáhkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Wthr:beatnat#báhkka BUVSSAT ;
beležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:belež MAGASH ;
birasgáhtteneiseválddit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:biras#gáhtten#eise#vál'di BUVSSAT ;
bohccebasttat:bohcce#bas'ta BUVSSAT ;
budjeahttaolbmážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:budjeahtta#olbmážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
budjeahttaolbmážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:budjeahtta#olbmáž MAGASH ;
bunnjelemasat+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:bunnjelemass EGEZHAGAT ;
burežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:burežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
burežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:burež MAGASH ;
bušeahttaolbmážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bušeahtta#olbmážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
bušeahttaolbmážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bušeahtta#olbmáž MAGASH ;
vuodjenklásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuodjen#klássa BUVSSAT ;
vuodjenjorrit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuodjen#jor'ri BUVSSAT ;
currežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:currežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
currežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:currež MAGASH ;
spábbačiekčandoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:spábba#čiekčan#doallu BUVSSAT ;
dovdosaččat+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:dovdosažž EGEZHAGAT ;
duolbabasttat:duolba#bas'ta BUVSSAT ;
eallinguimmežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eallin#guimmežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
eallinguimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eallin#guimmež MAGASH ;
siidaguimmežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:siida#guimmežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
siidaguimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:siida#guimmež MAGASH ;
valástallandoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:valástallan#doallu BUVSSAT ;
ednožagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ednožah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
ednožat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ednož MAGASH ;
egežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:egežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
egežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:egež MAGASH ;
etnežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:etnežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
etnežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:etnež MAGASH ;
etniidbeaidoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:etniid9#beai#doallu BUVSSAT ;
fievrridannávccat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:fievrridan#nák'ca BUVSSAT ;
fulkkežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:fulkkežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
fulkkežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:fulkkež MAGASH ;
geallegoarvvit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gealle#goar'vi BUVSSAT ;
gierrásaččat+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:gierrásažž EGEZHAGAT ;
gilgacikcenbasttat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gilga#cikcen#bas'ta BUVSSAT ;
goskkežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:goskkežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
goskkežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:goskkež MAGASH ;
guimmežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:guimmežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
guimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:guimmež MAGASH ;
gumpperuovddit+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gumppe#ruov'di BUVSSAT ;
gáimmežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gáimmežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
gáimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gáimmež MAGASH ;
gállagasdolat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gállagas#dolla BUVSSAT ;
gálojenežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gálojenež MAGASH ;
headjadoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:headja#doallu BUVSSAT ;
heavvojieŋat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:heavvo#jiekŋa BUVSSAT ;
johtolatdilálašvuođat+CmpN/PlG:johtolat#dilálašvuoh'ta BUVSSAT ;
jumežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:jumežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
jumežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:jumež MAGASH ;
juvssat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:juk'sa BUVSSAT ;
krukkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:krugga BUVSSAT ;
kránnjážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:kránnjáž MAGASH ;
leaipput:leaippu BUVSSAT ;
liippetáŋggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:liippe#táŋ'ga BUVSSAT ;
konfirmašundoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:konfirmašun#doallu BUVSSAT ;
loahppážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:loahppáž MAGASH ;
luovosvuovttat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:luovos#vuok'ta BUVSSAT ;
láhčamaččat+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:láhčamažž EGEZHAGAT ;
lávežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:lávež MAGASH ;
manemuččat+CmpN/PlG:manemužž EGEZHAGAT ;
manježat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:manjež MAGASH ;
mearrafámut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:mearra#fápmu BUVSSAT ;
moallaoappážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:moalla#oappážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
moallaoappážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:moalla#oappáž MAGASH ;
mágažagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:mágažah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
mágažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:mágaž MAGASH ;
jonssotávvudandoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:jonssot#ávvudan#doallu BUVSSAT ;
náittosguimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:náittos#guimmež MAGASH ;
oahppásaččat+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:oahppásažž EGEZHAGAT ;
oappážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oappážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
oappážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oappáž MAGASH ;
oarpmebeležagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oarpme#beležah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
oarpmeležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oarpmelež MAGASH ;
oarpmenbeležagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oarpmen#beležah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
olbmážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:olbmáž MAGASH ;
olympiagilvvut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:olympia#gil'vu BUVSSAT ;
sihkkeldoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:sihkkel#doallu BUVSSAT ;
ránnežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ránnežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
ránnjážat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ránnjáž MAGASH ;
ránnážagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ránnážah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
sierranahttinlanjat:sierranahttin#lanja BUVSSAT ;
spiležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:spilež MAGASH ;
stánžeságat:stánže#sáh'ka BUVSSAT ;
sámemeaštárčuoigangilvvut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:sáme#meaštár#čuoigan#gil'vu BUVSSAT ;
verddežagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:verddežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
vieljažat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vieljaž MAGASH ;
vielljabeležagat+CmpN/PlG+Hum:viellja#beležah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
vilbeležat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vil#belež MAGASH ;
gulahallannávccat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gulahallan#nák'ca BUVSSAT ;
girkosáttut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:girko#sáddu BUVSSAT ;
áhčežagat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:áhčežah'k EGEZHAGAT ;
oskkuguimmežat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oskku#guimmež MAGASH ;
šaddanbeaidoalut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:šaddan#beai#doallu BUVSSAT ;
čuovvogolut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:čuovvo#gollu BUVSSAT ;
